Utah statutes.
9-7-307.   Catalogue -- Rules.

The state law librarian shall catalogue all books, pamphlets, maps, charts, globes, papers, apparatus, and valuable specimens in the State Law Library and shall post in some conspicuous place a copy of the rules of the State Law Library.  The catalogue shall be made available, whether electronically or in writing, to the persons entitled to withdraw books from the State Law Library under Section 9-7-303.

